Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 15. Appraisal Rights and Other Remedies.
§ 13.1-738.
After-acquired shares.

A corporation may elect to withhold payment required by §

13.1-737

from any shareholder who was required to, but did not certify that beneficial ownership of all of the shareholder’s shares for which appraisal rights are asserted was acquired before the date set forth in the appraisal notice sent pursuant to subdivision B 1 of §

13.1-734

.

If the corporation elected to withhold payment under subsection A, it shall, within 30 days after the form required by subdivision B 2 b of §

13.1-734

is due, notify all shareholders who are described in subsection A:

Of the information required by subdivision B 1 of §

13.1-737

;

Of the corporation’s estimate of fair value pursuant to subdivision B 2 of §

13.1-737

and its offer to pay such value plus interest;

That they may accept the corporation’s estimate of fair value plus interest in full satisfaction of their demands or demand for appraisal under §

13.1-739

;

That those shareholders who wish to accept such offer must so notify the corporation’s secretary of their acceptance of the corporation’s offer within 30 days after receiving the offer; and

That those shareholders who do not satisfy the requirements for demanding appraisal under §

13.1-739

shall be deemed to have accepted the corporation’s offer.

Within 10 days after receiving a shareholder’s acceptance pursuant to subsection B, the corporation shall pay in cash the amount it offered under subdivision B 2, plus interest, to each shareholder who agreed to accept the corporation’s offer in full satisfaction of the shareholder’s demand.

Within 40 days after delivering the notice described in subsection B, the corporation shall pay in cash the amount it offered to pay under subdivision B 2, plus interest, to each shareholder described in subdivision B 5.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote this section.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 inserted “was required to, but” in subsection A and substituted “it shall, within” for “it must, within” in subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision B 4, substituted “corporation’s secretary” for “corporation”; in subsections C and D, inserted “plus interest” preceding “to each”; and in subsection D, substituted “delivering” for “sending”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-739.
Procedure if shareholder dissatisfied with payment or offer.

A shareholder paid pursuant to §

13.1-737

who is dissatisfied with the amount of the payment must notify the corporation’s secretary in writing of that shareholder’s estimate of the fair value of the shares and demand payment of that estimate plus interest, less any payment under §

13.1-737

. A shareholder offered payment under §

13.1-738

who is dissatisfied with that offer must reject the offer and demand payment of the shareholder’s stated estimate of the fair value of the shares plus interest.

A shareholder who fails to notify the corporation’s secretary in writing of that shareholder’s demand to be paid the shareholder’s stated estimate of the fair value plus interest under subsection A within 30 days after receiving the corporation’s payment or offer of payment under §

13.1-737

or

13.1-738

, respectively, waives the right to demand payment under this section and shall be entitled only to the payment made or offered pursuant to those respective sections.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-85, 13.1-75, 13.1-78; 1956, c. 428; 1968, c. 733; 1972, c. 425; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 613; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote this section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsections A and B, substituted “corporation’s secretary” for “corporation”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-740.
Court action.

If a shareholder makes a demand for payment under §

13.1-739

that remains unsettled, the corporation shall commence a proceeding within 60 days after receiving the payment demand and petition the court to determine the fair value of the shares and accrued interest. If the corporation does not commence the proceeding within the 60-day period, it shall pay in cash to each shareholder the amount the shareholder demanded pursuant to §

13.1-737

plus interest.

The corporation shall commence the proceeding in the circuit court of the city or county where the corporation’s principal office, or, if none in the Commonwealth, where its registered office, is located. If the corporation is a foreign corporation without a registered office in the Commonwealth, it shall commence the proceeding in the circuit court of the city or county in the Commonwealth where the principal office, or, if none in the Commonwealth, where the registered office of the domestic corporation merged with the foreign corporation was located at the time the transaction became effective.

The corporation shall make all shareholders, regardless of whether they are residents of the Commonwealth, whose demands remain unsettled parties to the proceeding as in an action against their shares, and all parties shall be served with a copy of the petition. Nonresidents may be served by registered or certified mail or by publication as provided by law.

The corporation may join as a party to the proceeding any shareholder who claims to have demanded an appraisal but who has not, in the opinion of the corporation, complied with the provisions of this article. If the court determines that a shareholder has not complied with the provisions of this article, that shareholder shall be dismissed as a party.

The jurisdiction of the court in which the proceeding is commenced under subsection B is plenary and exclusive. The court may appoint one or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend a decision on the question of fair value. The appraisers shall have the powers described in the order appointing them, or in any amendment to it. The shareholders demanding appraisal rights are entitled to the same discovery rights as parties in other civil proceedings. There shall be no right to a jury trial.

Each shareholder made a party to the proceeding is entitled to judgment (i) for the amount, if any, by which the court finds the fair value of the shareholder’s shares exceeds the amount paid by the corporation to the shareholder for such shares, plus interest or (ii) for the fair value plus interest of the shareholder’s shares for which the corporation elected to withhold payment under §

13.1-738

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-85, 13.1-75, 13.1-78; 1956, c. 428; 1968, c. 733; 1972, c. 425; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 613; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection C, substituted “regardless of whether they are” for “whether or not”; in subsection E, inserted “rights” preceding “are entitled”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-741.
Court costs and counsel fees.

The court in an appraisal proceeding commenced under §

13.1-740

shall determine all court costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court. The court shall assess the costs against the corporation, except that the court may assess court costs against all or some of the shareholders demanding appraisal, in amounts that the court finds equitable, to the extent the court finds such shareholders acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by this article.

The court in an appraisal proceeding may also assess the expenses of the respective parties, in amounts the court finds equitable:

Against the corporation and in favor of any or all shareholders demanding appraisal if the court finds the corporation did not substantially comply with the requirements of §

13.1-732

,

13.1-734

,

13.1-737

or

13.1-738

; or

Against either the corporation or a shareholder demanding appraisal, in favor of any other party, if the court finds that the party against whom the expenses are assessed acted arbitrarily, vexatiously or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by this article.

If the court in an appraisal proceeding finds that the expenses incurred by any shareholder were of substantial benefit to other shareholders similarly situated, and that such expenses should not be assessed against the corporation, the court may direct that such expenses be paid out of the amounts awarded the shareholders who were benefited.

To the extent the corporation fails to make a required payment pursuant to §

13.1-737

,

13.1-738

or

13.1-739

, the shareholder may sue directly for the amount owed and, to the extent successful, shall be entitled to recover from the corporation all expenses of the suit.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-85, 13.1-75, 13.1-78; 1956, c. 428; 1968, c. 733; 1972, c. 425; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 613; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, inserted “court” preceding “costs” twice; in subsection B, substituted “expenses of” for “fees and expenses of counsel and experts for”; in subdivision B 2, deleted “fees and” preceding “expenses”; in subsection C, substituted “expenses incurred by” for “services of counsel for,” substituted “such expenses” for “the fees for those services,” and substituted “direct that such expenses” for “award to such counsel reasonable fees to”; and in subsection D, substituted “expenses of the suit” for “costs and expenses of the suit, including counsel fees”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-741.1.
Limitations on other remedies for fundamental transactions.

Except for action taken before the Commission pursuant to §

13.1-614

or as provided in subsection B, the legality of a proposed or completed corporate action described in subsection A of §

13.1-730

may not be contested, nor may the corporate action be enjoined, set aside or rescinded, in a legal or equitable proceeding by a shareholder after the shareholders have approved the corporate action.

Subsection A does not apply to a corporate action that:

Was not authorized and approved in accordance with the applicable provisions of:

Article 11 (§

13.1-705

et seq.), Article 12 (§

13.1-715.1

et seq.), Article 12.1 (§

13.1-722.1:1

et seq.), Article 12.2 (§

13.1-722.8

et seq.), or Article 13 (§

13.1-723

et seq.);

The articles of incorporation or bylaws; or

The resolution of the board of directors authorizing the corporate action;

Was procured as a result of fraud, a material misrepresentation, or an omission of a material fact necessary to make statements made, in light of the circumstances in which they were made, not misleading;

Is an interested transaction, unless it has been recommended by the board of directors in the same manner as is provided in subsection B of §

13.1-691

or has been approved by the shareholders in the same manner as is provided in subsection C of §

13.1-691

as if the interested transaction were a director’s conflict of interests transaction; or

Is adopted or taken by less than unanimous consent of the voting shareholders pursuant to §

13.1-657

if:

Any remedial action with respect to corporate action described in subsection A of §

13.1-730

shall not limit the scope of, or be inconsistent with, any provision of §

13.1-614

.

a.

The challenge to the corporate action is brought by a shareholder who did not consent to the corporate action and as to whom notice of the approval of the corporate action was not effective at least 10 days before the corporate action was effected; and

b.

The proceeding challenging the corporate action is commenced within 10 days after notice of the adoption or taking of the corporate action is effective as to the shareholder bringing the proceeding.

History.

2007, c. 165; 2008, c. 91; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 91 inserted “for action taken before the Commission pursuant to §

13.1-614

or” near the beginning of subection A; substituted “adopted or taken” for “approved” in subdivision B 4; substitued “adoption or taking” for “approval” and “10” for “15” in subdivision B 4 a; substituted “adoption or taking” for “approval” in subdivision B 4 b; and added subsection C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 substituted “to the corporate action” for “and as to whom notice of the adoption or taking of the corporate action was not effective at least 10 days before the corporate action was effected” following “consent” in subdivision B 4 a.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision B 1 a., inserted “Article 12.1 (§

13.1-722.1:1

et seq.), Article 12.2 (§

13.1-722.8

et seq.)” preceding “or Article 13”; in subdivision B 3, substituted “recommended” for “authorized, approved or ratified,” and substituted “approved” for “authorized, approved or ratified”; in subdivision B 4 a., inserted “and as to whom notice of the approval of the corporate action was not effective at least 10 days before the corporate action was effected” following “action”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).